Washington statutes.
RCW 6.27.040

State and municipal corporations subject to garnishment—Service of writ.

(1) The state of Washington, all counties, cities, towns, school districts and other municipal corporations shall be subject to garnishment after judgment has been entered in the principal action, but not before, in the superior and district courts, in the same manner and with the same effect, as provided in the case of other garnishees.

(2) The venue of any such garnishment proceeding shall be the same as for the original action, and the writ shall be issued by the clerk of the court having jurisdiction of such original action or by the attorney of record for the judgment creditor in district court.

(3) The writ of garnishment shall be served upon the same officer as is required for service of summons upon the commencement of a civil action against the state, county, city, town, school district, or other municipal corporation, as the case may be.

[ 2003 c 222 s 2. Prior: 1987 c 442 s 1004; 1987 c 202 s 134; 1969 ex.s. c 264 s 6. Formerly RCW 7.33.060.]

NOTES:

Intent—1987 c 202: See note following RCW 2.04.190.